Wyoming, session 2025, SF0025.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-2-113 is created to read:
31-2-113. Electronic lien and title system.
(a) As used in this section "electronic lien and
title system" means a statewide electronic lien and title
system implemented by the department to process through
electronic means:
(i) Certificates of title for vehicles including
new, transferred and corrected certificates of title;
(ii) Certificate of title data in which a lien
is notated;
(iii) The notification, maintenance, perfection
and release of security interests in vehicles; and
(iv) Payment of sales or use tax pursuant to
W.S. 39-15-107(b) or 39-16-107(b).
(b) The department shall implement and administer an
electronic lien and title system as provided in this
section.
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0025
ENROLLED ACT NO. 5, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(c) The department may contract with one (1) or more
vendors to develop, implement and provide ongoing
administration of the electronic lien and title system
required under subsection (b) of this section. The vendors
may charge a transaction fee for each transaction provided
through the electronic lien and title system to recover the
vendor's costs associated with the development,
implementation and ongoing administration of the electronic
lien and title system. No vendor shall charge any fees
under this subsection to the state or counties.
(d) Except for persons who are not normally engaged
in the business or practice of financing vehicles, all
dealers, lenders, lienholders, insurance companies and
secured parties shall use the electronic lien and title
system required under subsection (b) of this section. All
counties shall use the electronic lien and title system
required under subsection (b) of this section. Each person
not normally engaged in the business or practice of
financing vehicles including owners may use the electronic
lien and title system or request a paper certificate of
title at the office of a county clerk.
(e) This section shall not apply to certificates of
title for mobile homes as defined in W.S. 31-2-501(a)(ii).
Section 2. W.S. 31-1-202(c) and (d), 31-2-101,
31-2-103(a)(intro), (v), (vi) and (d), 31-2-104(a), (h)(i)
and (ii), 31-2-105(a), (b)(intro), (i)(D) and (c) through
(f) and 31-2-107(a), (f) through (j) and (o) are amended to
read:
31-1-202. Records.
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0025
ENROLLED ACT NO. 5, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(c) Within three (3) business days after issuance of
a vehicle registration or certificate of title, county
treasurers and county clerks shall forward a record thereof
to the department. County clerks shall forward a record of
certificate of title electronically through the electronic
lien and title system established under W.S. 31-2-113.
County treasurers shall notify the department and sheriff
of his county of loss or mutilation of license plates.
(d) The department shall maintain records of vehicle
registrations from all counties indexed by distinctive
vehicle numbers assigned by the department, the name of the
registered owner and vehicle identification numbers. The
department shall maintain a record of all vehicle
certificates of title from all counties in the electronic
lien and title system established under W.S. 31-2-113.
Records are public and open to inspection by the public
during reasonable office hours. The department shall
maintain a vehicle identification number index of all
vehicles for which certificates of title have been issued.
Upon receipt of a notice of issuance of a certificate of
title from any county clerk the department may destroy all
records relating to former transfers of title to the
vehicle and shall retain only the notice of issuance of the
certificate of title in effect at any time. The department
may annually compile and publish a list of all registered
vehicles and supplements thereto which shall be furnished
to Wyoming peace officers and the Wyoming office of
homeland security without charge.
31-2-101. Required application; resident and
nonresident applications.
(a) Except as provided by W.S. 31-2-102 and pursuant
to W.S. 31-1-101(a)(xxi)(A) through (G), any owner of a
3

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0025
ENROLLED ACT NO. 5, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
vehicle for which no Wyoming certificate of title has been
issued to the owner or the transferee upon transfer of
ownership of a vehicle for which a Wyoming certificate of
title is required, shall apply for a certificate of title
electronically through the electronic lien and title system
established under W.S. 31-2-113 or at the office of a
county clerk, or if available, electronically, within the
same time periods as required by W.S. 31-2-201(a)(ii) and
(iii).
(b) Any owner, owner's agent or transferee upon
transfer of ownership of any vehicle that has an
identifying number pursuant to W.S. 31-1-101(a)(ix),
including off-road recreational or multipurpose vehicles
and, for the purpose of titling under this section,
including snowmobiles and watercraft, shall apply for a
certificate of title electronically through the electronic
lien and title system established under W.S. 31-2-113 or at
the office of a county clerk.
(c) Any nonresident person registered as a business
entity under the laws of another state in the United States
and who operates a vehicle in this state for business or
commercial purposes for which no Wyoming certificate of
title has been issued may apply for a certificate of title
for that vehicle electronically through the electronic lien
and title system established under W.S. 31-2-113 or at the
office of a county clerk., or if available, electronically.
31-2-103. Contents of application; signature; vehicle
identification number; issuance of certificate.
(a) Applications for paper certificates of title or
electronic certificates of title, if available, shall
contain or be accompanied by:
4

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0025
ENROLLED ACT NO. 5, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(v) The current title containing an assignment
and warranty of title, if applicable, and an affidavit by
the seller, either on a separate form through the
electronic lien and title system established under W.S.
31-2-113 that provides remote authentication or contained
on the current title, which shall contain a reference to
the federal regulations stating that failure to complete or
providing false information may result in fines and
imprisonment and may include a department approved
statement in substantially the following form: "I state
that the odometer now reads .... miles (no tenths) and to
the best of my knowledge that it reflects the actual
mileage of the vehicle described herein unless one (1) of
the following statements is checked: A. I hereby certify
that to the best of my knowledge the odometer reading
reflects the amount of mileage is in excess of its
mechanical limits; B. I hereby certify that the odometer
reading is NOT the actual mileage. WARNING-ODOMETER
DISCREPANCY", to be retained by the county clerk upon
issuance of a new title. This paragraph shall not apply to
vehicles not originally manufactured with an odometer;
(vi) In the case of a vehicle registered or
titled in a state other than Wyoming, or any homemade
vehicle, rebuilt vehicle, reconstructed vehicle, any
vehicle assembled from a kit or any vehicle for which a
bond is required, a current statement submitted to the
office of the county clerk or through the electronic lien
and title system established under W.S. 31-2-113, made by a
Wyoming law enforcement officer, or licensed Wyoming dealer
only for vehicles in his inventory or possession, that the
vehicle identification number on the vehicle has been
inspected and that the inspection occurred in Wyoming and
certifying the correct vehicle identification number
5

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0025
ENROLLED ACT NO. 5, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
displayed on the vehicle. Any licensed Wyoming dealer
performing an inspection of a vehicle identification number
under this section shall, in addition to the requirements
of this act, do so pursuant to W.S. 31-11-108. In the case
of a vehicle not in Wyoming, the vehicle identification
number may be inspected and certified on a form approved by
the department if the inspection is made by an authorized
law enforcement officer of a city, county or state law
enforcement agency or a commissioned officer at a federal
military installation or any other person authorized to do
so by law and delivered to the county clerk in the county
where the application for certificate of title is made
along with payment for the inspection fee required under
W.S. 31-3-102(b)(iv);
(d) Upon receipt of an application and payment of
fees any county clerk shall, if satisfied that the
applicant is the owner of the vehicle for which application
for certificate of title is made, issue a paper certificate
of title if requested by the applicant or electronic
certificate of title, if available, upon a form or
electronic format, approved by and provided at cost to the
county clerk by the department in the name of the owner
bearing the signature and seal of the county clerk's
office. The county clerk shall not deliver a certificate of
title issued under this section until presentation of a
receipt for payment of sales or use tax pursuant to W.S.
39-15-107(b) or 39-16-107(b) or presentation of a county
treasurer receipt noting a valid exemption from paying the
sales or use tax. If a lien is filed with respect to the
vehicle, the county clerk shall, within three (3) business
days, deliver a copy of the filed lien and a copy of the
issued title to the financial institution. and if
available, such The delivery may be made electronically.
Each paper certificate of title or and electronic version,
6

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0025
ENROLLED ACT NO. 5, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
certificate of title shall bear a document control number
with county designation and certificate of title number.
The title shall be completely filled out giving a
description of the vehicle including factory price in a
manner prescribed by the department, indicate all
encumbrances or liens on the vehicle and indicate the date
of issue. Certificates of title shall contain forms for
assignment of title or interest and warranty thereof by the
owner with space for notation of liens and encumbrances at
the time of transfer on the reverse side and contain space
for the notarization of the seller's signature or an
electronic signature in accordance with W.S. 40-21-101
through 40-21-119, for a sale or transfer of title.
Certificates of title are valid for the vehicle so long as
the vehicle is owned or held by the person in whose name
the title was issued. A certificate of title is prima facie
proof of ownership of the vehicle for which the certificate
was issued.
31-2-104. Transfer of ownership.
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
owner of a vehicle who sells or transfers his interest in a
vehicle for which a certificate of title has been issued
shall endorse an assignment and warranty of title upon the
certificate for the vehicle with a statement of all liens
and encumbrances thereon, which assignment, warranty and
statement shall be signed and dated by the owner before a
notarial officer and acknowledged thereby in the manner
provided by law or signed electronically in accordance with
W.S. 40-21-101 through 40-21-119, to be dated and delivered
to the transferee at the time of delivering the vehicle.
Delivery may be made electronically through the electronic
lien and title system established under W.S. 31-2-113.
Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the
7

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0025
ENROLLED ACT NO. 5, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
transferee shall present the certificate to a county clerk
and apply for a new certificate of title electronically
through the electronic lien and title system established
under W.S. 31-2-113 or at the office of a county clerk
within the same time periods as required by W.S.
31-2-201(a)(ii).
(h) The requirement under subsection (a) of this
section to deliver a certificate of title to a transferee
at the time the vehicle is delivered does not apply to a
transferor if:
(i) The certificate of title is being held by a
bank or other financial institution on the date the vehicle
is delivered. The transferor shall then deliver to the
transferee a dealer's invoice or a signed bill of sale, in
substantially the form specified in paragraph (ii) of this
subsection, and the certificate of title shall be delivered
either in person or electronically through the electronic
lien and title system established under W.S. 31-2-113 to
the transferee within thirty (30) days from the date of the
sale; or
(ii) The transferor is an auctioneer of vehicles
and transfers the vehicle in the course of his business as
an auctioneer of vehicles or through an auctioneer of
vehicles. The transferor or auctioneer shall then deliver
the certificate of title either in person or electronically
through the electronic lien and title system established
under W.S. 31-2-113 to the transferee within thirty (30)
days of the date of sale and shall deliver to the
transferee at the time the vehicle is delivered a signed
bill of sale in substantially the following form:
VEHICLE BILL OF SALE
8

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0025
ENROLLED ACT NO. 5, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
I, (PRINTED NAME OF TRANSFEROR OR AUCTIONEER), on (date),
hereby sell and convey all (my interest the interest of
(name of current owner)) in the following described
vehicle: (COLOR, YEAR, MAKE, MODEL, VEHICLE IDENTIFICATION
NUMBER) to (PRINTED NAME OF TRANSFEREE) in exchange for:
(sales price). I hereby state that the certificate of
title for the above described vehicle is held by (PRINTED
NAME OF TRANSFEROR-VEHICLE AUCTIONEER, BANK OR OTHER
FINANCIAL INSTITUTION) and that within thirty (30) days,
(PRINTED NAME OF TRANSFEREE) will be provided a properly
executed title free of all liens for the vehicle unless
otherwise specified in this bill of sale. I certify (or
declare) under penalty of perjury under the laws of the
State of Wyoming that the contents of this document are
true and correct.
DATE: _________
_______________________________________
(TRANSFEROR'S OR AUCTIONEER'S SIGNATURE)
___________________________________________________________
___________________________________________________________
___________________________________________________________
(TRANSFEROR'S OR AUCTIONEER'S ADDRESS, PHONE NUMBER AND
DRIVER'S LICENSE, IDENTIFICATION OR DEALER NUMBER)
31-2-105. Duplicate titles; affidavit of vehicle
ownership.
(a) Upon loss of a paper certificate of title, the
owner may apply to the county clerk issuing the original
9

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0025
ENROLLED ACT NO. 5, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
title for a duplicate paper certificate of title or
electronic certificate of title. For purposes of applying
for a duplicate title, "owner" means any one (1) person
listed as owner on the face of the title. The applicant
shall file an affidavit describing the loss of a paper
certificate of title with the county clerk. Upon payment of
fees the county clerk shall issue a duplicate paper
certificate of title or electronic certificate of title
corresponding to the original certificate and containing
the following notation prominently displayed in capital
letters on the face of the certificate: "THIS IS A
DUPLICATE CERTIFICATE OF TITLE AND MAY BE SUBJECT TO THE
RIGHTS OF A PERSON OR PERSONS UNDER THE ORIGINAL
CERTIFICATE".
(b) If an applicant for a paper certificate of title
or electronic certificate of title required by this act is
unable to provide the county clerk with a certificate of
title that assigns the prior owner's interest, a notarized
bill of sale or other evidence of ownership that satisfies
the county clerk that the applicant owns the vehicle, a
paper certificate of title or electronic certificate of
title may be issued only if:
(i) The applicant submits an affidavit of
vehicle ownership on a form prescribed by the department
that shall be signed and sworn before a person who is
authorized to administer oaths and affirmations. The
affidavit shall contain:
(D) A statement that the applicant is the
true and lawful owner of the vehicle and has the right to
have a paper certificate of title or electronic certificate
of title issued.
10

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0025
ENROLLED ACT NO. 5, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(c) If the vehicle for which the applicant is
applying for a paper certificate of title or electronic
certificate of title has a value less than two thousand
five hundred dollars ($2,500.00), a paper title or
electronic title may be issued without a bond if the
applicant presents an affidavit of vehicle ownership, a
notarized bill of sale, a certified, written statement of
the value from a properly licensed Wyoming vehicle dealer
and a vehicle identification number (VIN) inspection, or
any other information the county clerk may require for
proof of ownership, at the time of application.
(d) Any bond required by this section shall be
executed by a surety duly authorized to carry on business
in Wyoming or by individual sureties qualified as provided
by W.S. 1-1-104 and 1-1-105. The amount of any bond
required under this section shall not be less than double
the value of the vehicle determined at the time of the
application. If the value of the vehicle cannot be
determined from any prior registration or title, the
applicant shall provide the county clerk the value of the
vehicle. The value of the vehicle shall be determined by
the applicant or the surety from any current national
appraisal guide, current or past registration if the value
is present on any registration for the vehicle, or the
value may be on certified written statement obtained from a
properly licensed Wyoming vehicle dealer. The bond shall be
conditioned to indemnify a prior owner, lienholder,
subsequent purchaser, secured creditor or encumbrancer of
the vehicle and any respective successors in interest
against expenses, losses or damages, including reasonable
attorney fees, caused by the issuance of the paper
certificate of title or electronic certificate of title or
by a defect in or undisclosed security interest upon the
right, title and interest of the applicant in the vehicle.
11

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0025
ENROLLED ACT NO. 5, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(e) If any person suffers a loss or damage by reason
of the filing or issuance of the paper certificate of title
or electronic certificate of title as provided in this
section, such person shall have a right of action to seek
relief directly against the applicant and the surety on the
applicant's bond against either of whom the person damaged
may proceed independently of the other, but the aggregate
liability of the surety to any or all persons seeking
relief shall not exceed the total amount of the bond.
(f) If an applicant is applying for a paper
certificate of title or electronic certificate of title to
a vehicle which he will restore for his own personal use, a
paper title or electronic title may be issued without a
bond required by this section if the applicant presents an
affidavit of vehicle ownership, a notarized bill of sale, a
certified written statement of the value of the vehicle and
a vehicle identification number (VIN) inspection, at the
time of application. If the value of the vehicle cannot be
determined from any prior registration or title, the
applicant shall provide the county clerk the value of the
vehicle. The value of the vehicle shall be determined from
any current national appraisal guide, or the applicant may
elect to submit a certified written statement obtained from
a properly licensed Wyoming vehicle dealer stating the
appraised value of the vehicle. Any paper certificate of
title or electronic certificate of title issued under this
subsection shall state on its face that it is
nontransferable for one hundred eighty (180) days from the
date title issued. Notwithstanding the other requirements
of this subsection, a vehicle shall only be eligible to be
titled under this subsection if, on the date the applicant
purchased the vehicle it was not operational and could not
have been rendered operational without substantial repairs
12

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0025
ENROLLED ACT NO. 5, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
to one (1) or more of the vehicle's mechanical systems. The
department shall define the term "substantial repairs" by
rule and regulation.
31-2-107. Titles for damaged vehicles; return of
certificate of title and registration for damaged vehicle;
replacement title and registration.
(a) When a motor vehicle is declared a total loss by
the insurance company or, in the event an insurance company
is not involved in the settlement of the claim, sustains
damage in an amount exceeding seventy-five percent (75%) of
its actual retail cash value, as set forth in any current
edition of a nationally recognized automotive appraisal
guide or other source approved by the Wyoming insurance
department, the owner or insurance company, if it obtains
ownership of the vehicle through transfer of title as a
result of a settlement of an insurance claim, shall forward
the properly endorsed certificate of title, either to the
office of the county clerk or electronically through the
electronic lien and title system established under W.S.
31-2-113, to the office of the county clerk that issued the
certificate of title together with an electronic
application, submitted through the electronic lien and
title system, for a certificate of title branded salvage
and payment of the fee required under W.S. 31-3-102(a)(vii)
to obtain a properly branded certificate of title. The
owner or insurance company may request a paper certificate
of title branded salvage from the office of the county
clerk. For purposes of this section, a certificate of title
endorsed by an electronic signature shall constitute a
properly endorsed certificate of title, which need not be
notarized. When any vehicle accident report is required
under chapter 5, article 11 of this title, the
investigating officer shall provide written notice to the
13

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0025
ENROLLED ACT NO. 5, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
owner or operator of the vehicle of the requirements under
this section.
(f) If the owner of a motor vehicle retains the
vehicle upon a settlement with an insurance company, and
the vehicle has incurred damage requiring the vehicle to be
issued a certificate of title branded "nonrepairable" or
"salvage", the owner shall apply for the certificate of
title electronically through the electronic lien and title
system established under W.S. 31-2-113 or at the office of
the county clerk in his own name with the applicable brand
displayed on the certificate of title before the vehicle is
commercially repaired or ownership of the vehicle is
transferred.
(g) If an insurance company is not involved in a
damage settlement involving a salvage vehicle, the motor
vehicle owner shall apply for a certificate of title
branded "salvage", electronically through the electronic
lien and title system established under W.S. 31-2-113 or at
the office of the county clerk before the vehicle is
commercially repaired or ownership of the vehicle is
transferred.
(h) If a leased motor vehicle incurs damage requiring
the vehicle to be issued a certificate of title branded
"salvage", the lessor shall apply for a properly branded
certificate of title electronically through the electronic
lien and title system established under W.S. 31-2-113 or at
the office of the county clerk after being notified by the
lessee that the vehicle has been damaged. The lessee of the
vehicle shall inform the lessor that the leased vehicle has
been damaged within thirty (30) days after the occurrence
of the damage.
14

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0025
ENROLLED ACT NO. 5, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(j) Any person acquiring ownership of a damaged motor
vehicle that meets the definition of a salvage vehicle for
which a certificate of title branded "salvage" has not been
issued shall apply for a certificate of title
electronically through the electronic lien and title system
established under W.S. 31-2-113 or at the office of a
county clerk before the vehicle is further transferred.
(o) If an insurance company is unable to obtain a
properly endorsed certificate of title within thirty (30)
days of payment of damages in a claim settlement involving
transfer of a salvage vehicle to the insurance company, the
insurance company, an occupational licensee of the
department authorized by the insurance company or a salvage
pool authorized by the insurance company may request the
county clerk issue a certificate of title branded salvage
for the vehicle. The request shall be submitted on
electronically through the electronic lien and title system
established under W.S. 31-2-113 in a form format provided
by the office of the county clerk and signed electronically
with an electronic signature in accordance with W.S.
40-21-101 through 40-21-119 under penalty of perjury. The
request shall include and document evidence that the
insurance company has paid a claim on the vehicle and has
made at least two (2) written attempts to obtain the
properly endorsed certificate of title at the last known
address of the owner of the vehicle. The request shall also
include a disclosure of any and all security interests,
liens or encumbrances that are known to the insurance
company and that are outstanding against the vehicle.
Section 3.
(a) The department of transportation shall promulgate
any rules necessary to implement this act. The department
15

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0025
ENROLLED ACT NO. 5, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
of transportation may contract with one (1) or more vendors
to develop and implement the electronic lien and title
system as authorized under section 1 of this act.
(b) Upon promulgating a fee schedule for the
electronic lien and title system or not later than November
1, 2026, whichever is earlier, the department of
transportation shall report to the joint transportation,
highways and military affairs interim committee on the fee
schedule that will be used to implement the electronic lien
and title system.
16

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0025
ENROLLED ACT NO. 5, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 4.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2027.
(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
17